Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.340

Appliance efficiency rebate program.

The department may create an appliance efficiency rebate program with available funds from the energy efficient appliances rebate program authorized under the federal energy policy act of 2005 (P.L. 109-58).

[ 2009 c 379 s 207.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2009 c 379: See notes following RCW 70A.50.010.